Illinois, session 104th, HB2984.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Biometric Information Privacy Act is 5amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (740 ILCS 14/10)7    Sec. 10. Definitions. In this Act:8    "Biometric identifier" means a retina or iris scan, 9fingerprint, voiceprint, or scan of hand or face geometry, or 10neural data. Biometric identifiers do not include writing 11samples, written signatures, photographs, human biological 12samples used for valid scientific testing or screening, 13demographic data, tattoo descriptions, or physical 14descriptions such as height, weight, hair color, or eye color. 15Biometric identifiers do not include donated organs, tissues, 16or parts as defined in the Illinois Anatomical Gift Act or 17blood or serum stored on behalf of recipients or potential 18recipients of living or cadaveric transplants and obtained or 19stored by a federally designated organ procurement agency. 20Biometric identifiers do not include biological materials 21regulated under the Genetic Information Privacy Act. Biometric 22identifiers do not include information captured from a patient 23in a health care setting or information collected, used, or   HB2984- 2 -LRB104 09768 JRC 19834 b1stored for health care treatment, payment, or operations under 2the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability 3Act of 1996. Biometric identifiers do not include an X-ray, 4roentgen process, computed tomography, MRI, PET scan, 5mammography, or other image or film of the human anatomy used 6to diagnose, prognose, or treat an illness or other medical 7condition or to further validate scientific testing or 8screening.9    "Biometric information" means any information, regardless 10of how it is captured, converted, stored, or shared, based on 11an individual's biometric identifier used to identify an 12individual. Biometric information does not include information 13derived from items or procedures excluded under the definition 14of biometric identifiers.15    "Confidential and sensitive information" means personal 16information that can be used to uniquely identify an 17individual or an individual's account or property. Examples of 18confidential and sensitive information include, but are not 19limited to, a genetic marker, genetic testing information, a 20unique identifier number to locate an account or property, an 21account number, a PIN number, a pass code, a driver's license 22number, or a social security number.23    "Electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol, 24or process attached to or logically associated with a record 25and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the 26record.  HB2984- 3 -LRB104 09768 JRC 19834 b1    "Neural data" means information that is generated by the 2measurement of activity of an individual's central or 3peripheral nervous system, and that is not inferred from 4non-neural information. 5    "Private entity" means any individual, partnership, 6corporation, limited liability company, association, or other 7group, however organized. A private entity does not include a 8State or local government agency. A private entity does not 9include any court of Illinois, a clerk of the court, or a judge 10or justice thereof.11    "Written release" means informed written consent, 12electronic signature, or, in the context of employment, a 13release executed by an employee as a condition of employment.14(Source: P.A. 103-769, eff. 8-2-24.)